Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,263
Privileges; sections; how construed.

Sections 25-21,254 to 25-21,262 do not limit, waive, or abrogate the scope or nature of any statutory or common-law privilege, including the work-product doctrine and the attorney-client privilege.

Laws 1998, LB 395, § 10.